Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-277.01
Mental health hearing; requirements.

All hearings concerning a juvenile court petition filed pursuant to subdivision (3)(c) of section 43-247 shall be closed to the public except at the request of the juvenile or the juvenile's parent or guardian. Such hearings shall be held in a courtroom or at any convenient and suitable place designated by the juvenile court judge. The proceeding may be conducted where the juvenile is currently residing if the juvenile is unable to travel.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 70.